Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.168

Allotment of appropriations for school plant facilities—Use of taxable valuation and state funding assistance percentage in determining eligibility.

Whenever the voters of a school district authorize the issuance of bonds and/or the levying of excess taxes in an amount sufficient to meet the requirements of RCW 28A.525.162 respecting eligibility for state funding assistance in providing school facilities, the taxable valuation of the district and the state funding assistance percentage in providing school facilities prevailing at the time of such authorization shall be the valuation and the percentage used for the purpose of determining the eligibility of the district for an allotment of state funds and the amount or amounts of such allotments, respectively, for all projects for which the voters authorize capital funds as aforesaid, unless a higher state funding assistance percentage prevails on the date that state funds for assistance in financing a project are allotted by the superintendent of public instruction in which case the percentage prevailing on the date of allotment by the superintendent of funds for each project shall govern: PROVIDED, That if the superintendent of public instruction, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel, determines at any time that there has been undue or unwarranted delay on the part of school district authorities in advancing a project to the point of readiness for an allotment of state funds, the taxable valuation of the school district and the state funding assistance percentage prevailing on the date that the allotment is made shall be used for the purposes aforesaid: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the date specified in this section as applicable in determining the eligibility of an individual school district for state funding assistance and in determining the amount of such assistance shall be applicable also to cases where it is necessary in administering chapter 28A.540 RCW to determine eligibility for and the amount of state funding assistance for a group of school districts considered as a single school administrative unit.

[ 2009 c 129 s 7; 2006 c 263 s 312; 1990 c 33 s 458; 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.47.804, 28.47.804.]

NOTES:

Intent—2009 c 129: See note following RCW 28A.335.230.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 244: See note following RCW 28A.525.162.